Louisiana, session 2026, HB119.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:73.13(A) and (C)(introductory paragraph), (3), and (4),
73.14(C)(introductory paragraph), (3), and (4) and (D), and 81.1.1(D)(1) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 14:73.13(C)(5) and (6), 73.14(C)(5) and (6), 73.14.1, and
81.1.1(A)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§73.13. Unlawful deepfakes
A.(1) Any person who, with knowledge that the material is a deepfake
depicting a minor, knowingly creates or possesses material that depicts a minor
engaging in sexual conduct shall be punished by imprisonment at hard labor for not
less than five nor more than twenty years, or a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars, or both. At least five years of the sentence of imprisonment imposed shall
be served without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
(2) If the offender is an educator and the victim is a student, the offender
may be imprisoned for an additional two years with or without hard labor, to be
served consecutively to the sentence imposed under this Section.
* * *
C. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
* * *
(3) "Educator" means any administrator, coach, instructor, paraprofessional,
student aide, teacher, or teacher aide at any public or nonpublic elementary school,
secondary school, or high school in this state who is assigned, employed, or working
at the school or school system where the victim is enrolled as a student on a
full-time, part-time, or temporary basis.
(3) (4) "Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) (5) "Sexual conduct" means any of the following, whether actual or
simulated: sexual intercourse, oral copulation, anal intercourse, anal oral copulation,
masturbation, bestiality, sexual sadism, sexual masochism, penetration of the vagina
or rectum by any object in a lewd or lascivious manner, exhibition of the genitals or
pubic or rectal area for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer, or excretory
functions performed in a lewd or lascivious manner, whether or not any of the
conduct is performed alone or between members of the same or opposite sex or
between humans and animals. An act is simulated when it gives the appearance of
being actual sexual conduct.
(6) "Student" means any person who is under the age of seventeen years and
is enrolled at any public or nonpublic elementary school, secondary school, or high
school in this state.
§73.14. Unlawful dissemination or sale of images of another created by artificial
intelligence
* * *
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
C. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
* * *
(3) "Educator" means any administrator, coach, instructor, paraprofessional,
student aide, teacher, or teacher aide at any public or nonpublic elementary school,
secondary school, or high school in this state who is assigned, employed, or working
at the school or school system where the victim is enrolled as a student on a
full-time, part-time, or temporary basis.
(3) (4) "Electronic mail service provider" means any person or entity,
including an internet service provider, that is an intermediary in sending or receiving
electronic mail or that provides to end users of the electronic mail service the ability
to send or receive electronic mail.
(4) (5) "Interactive computer service" means any information service,
system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by
multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that
provides access to the internet and such systems operated or services offered by
libraries or educational institutions.
(6) "Student" means any person who is under the age of seventeen years and
is enrolled at any public or nonpublic elementary school, secondary school, or high
school in this state.
D.(1) Whoever Except as provided in Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
Subsection, whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned with
or without hard labor for not more than six months one year, fined not more than
seven hundred fifty one thousand dollars, or both.
(2) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section when the depicted person
is under the age of seventeen years shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor
for not more than five years. At least one year of the sentence of imprisonment shall
be imposed without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
(3) If the offender is an educator and the victim is a student, the offender
may be imprisoned for an additional two years with or without hard labor, to be
served consecutively to the sentence imposed under this Section.
(4) If the offender is under the age of fourteen years, the disposition shall be
governed exclusively by the provisions of Title VII of the Louisiana Children's Code.
* * *
§73.14.1. Unlawful possession of images of another created by artificial intelligence
A. It is unlawful for any person to possess any video or still image created
by artificial intelligence that depicts another person who is under the age of
seventeen years and is totally nude or in a state of undress so as to expose the
genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or female breasts, when the person possessing the
video or still image knows or has reason to know that the person is not licensed or
authorized to possess such video or still image.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Another person" includes a person whose image was used in creating,
adapting, or modifying a video or still image with the intent to depict an actual
person and who is recognizable as an actual person by the person's face, likeness, or
other distinguishing characteristic.
(2) "Artificial intelligence" means an artificial system developed in computer
software, physical hardware, or other context that solves tasks requiring human-like
perception, cognition, planning, learning, communication, or physical action.
(3) "Educator" means any administrator, coach, instructor, paraprofessional,
student aide, teacher, or teacher aide at any public or nonpublic elementary school,
secondary school, or high school in this state who is assigned, employed, or working
at the school or school system where the victim is enrolled as a student on a
full-time, part-time, or temporary basis.
(4) "Electronic mail service provider" means any person or entity, including
an internet service provider, that is an intermediary in sending or receiving electronic
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
mail or that provides to end users of the electronic mail service the ability to send or
receive electronic mail.
(5) "Interactive computer service" means any information service, system,
or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple
users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides
access to the internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or
educational institutions.
(6) "Student" means any person who is under the age of seventeen years and
is enrolled at any public or nonpublic elementary school, secondary school, or high
school in this state.
C.(1) Except as provided in Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection,
whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned with or without
hard labor for not more than five years. At least one year of the sentence of
imprisonment shall be imposed without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension
of sentence.
(2) If the offender is an educator and the victim is a student, the offender
may be imprisoned for an additional two years with or without hard labor, to be
served consecutively to the sentence imposed under this Section.
(3) If the offender is under the age of fourteen years, the disposition shall be
governed exclusively by the provisions of Title VII of the Louisiana Children's Code.
D. This Section does not apply to an interactive computer service, electronic
mail service provider, or a provider of a telecommunications service or any
information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, or a system or access software
provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer
server that was used by a person to violate this Section.
E. This Section does not apply to a person who did not have the specific
intent to receive any video or still image created by artificial intelligence and who
has not consented to receipt of such video or still image.
* * *
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
§81.1.1. "Sexting"; prohibited acts; penalties
A.(1)
* * *
(3) No person under the age of seventeen years shall knowingly possess, sell,
or maliciously disseminate any video or still image created by artificial intelligence
that depicts another person who is totally nude or in a state of undress so as to expose
the genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or female breasts with the intent to coerce, harass,
or intimidate another person when the person disseminating, possessing, or selling
the video or still image knows or has reason to know that the person is not licensed
or authorized to disseminate, possess, or sell such video or still image.
* * *
D.(1) For a violation of the provisions of Paragraph (A)(1) or (3) of this
Section, the offender's disposition shall be governed exclusively by the provisions
of Title VII of the Louisiana Children's Code.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:416.20.1 and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.20.1. Information; dissemination, sale, or possession of images of another
created by artificial intelligence; Louisiana Department of Education; public
school distribution
A. The principal of each public school shall disseminate information during
the first five days of each school year to each student grades six and above regarding
the crime and consequences of unlawful dissemination or sale of images of another
created by artificial intelligence as provided in R.S. 14:73.14 and unlawful
possession of images of another created by artificial intelligence as provided in R.S.
14:73.14.1. This information may be incorporated into an existing orientation
program. In addition to each student, the information shall be provided to each
student's parent or legal guardian on a written form containing a signature line for
each student's parent or legal guardian to sign to acknowledge receipt and
understanding of the information, which the parent or legal guardian shall return to
the school. The information required by this Section shall be age and grade
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 119 ENROLLED
appropriate and shall give full consideration as to whether the student is in a regular
or special program of education.
B. The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop the information
prescribed by this Section and provide it to each public school governing authority,
which shall disseminate it to each principal for this purpose.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Information relative to unlawful dissemination or sale of images of
another created by artificial intelligence as provided in R.S. 14:73.14 and unlawful
possession of images of another created by artificial intelligence as provided in R.S.
14:73.14.1.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall be cited and referred to as "The Ivy Daniels Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.